Materials for lyx workshop/LyX.app/Contents/Resources/dicts/kik_KE.aff
FLAG num
# All Noun Classes Subject, Assumed Object, Remote Future, Present Consecutive -kaa, -ka
PFX 612 Y 383
PFX 612 e nge e 
PFX 612 ũ ngo ũ	
PFX 612 0 nga [^ĩeoũ]
PFX 612 e ngee e
PFX 612 ĩ ngee ĩ
PFX 612 o ngoo o
PFX 612 ũ ngoo ũ
PFX 612 0 ngaa [^ĩeoũ]
PFX 612 0 tũka [bghmnr]
PFX 612 0 tũkaa [bghmnr] 	
PFX 612 a tũka a[^cktĩ]	
PFX 612 a tũkaa a[^cktĩ] 	
PFX 612 e tũke e[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 e tũge e[cktĩ]
PFX 612 e tũgee e[cktĩ]		
PFX 612 i tũkai i[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 i tũkaai i[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 i tũgai i[cktĩ]
PFX 612 i tũgaai i[cktĩ]
PFX 612 ĩ tũke ĩ[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 ĩ tũkee ĩ[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 ĩ tũge ĩ[cktĩ]
PFX 612 ĩ tũgee ĩ[cktĩ]
PFX 612 ũ tũko ũ[^ckt]
PFX 612 ũ tũkoo ũ[^ckt]
PFX 612 ũ tũgo ũ[ckt]
PFX 612 ũ tũgoo ũ[ckt]
PFX 612 a tũga a[cktĩ]
PFX 612 a tũgaa a[cktĩ]
PFX 612 0 tũga [ckt]
PFX 612 0 tũgaa [ckt]
PFX 612 0 ũka [bghmnr]	
PFX 612 0 ũkaa [bghmnr] 	
PFX 612 a ũka a[^cktĩ]	 	
PFX 612 a ũkaa a[^cktĩ] 	
PFX 612 e ũke e[^cktĩ]	
PFX 612 e ũge e[cktĩ]	
PFX 612 e ũgee e[cktĩ]		
PFX 612 i ũkai i[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 i ũkaai i[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 i ũgai i[cktĩ]
PFX 612 i ũgaai i[cktĩ]
PFX 612 ĩ ũke ĩ[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 ĩ ũkee ĩ[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 ĩ ũge ĩ[cktĩ]
PFX 612 ĩ ũgee ĩ[cktĩ]
PFX 612 ũ ũko ũ[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 ũ ũkoo ũ[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 ũ ũgo ũ[cktĩ]
PFX 612 ũ ũgoo ũ[cktĩ]
PFX 612 o ũko o[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 o ũkoo o[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 o ũgo o[cktĩ]
PFX 612 o ũgoo o[cktĩ]
PFX 612 a ũga a[cktĩ]
PFX 612 a ũgaa a[cktĩ]
PFX 612 0 ũga [ckt]
PFX 612 0 ũgaa [ckt]
PFX 612 0 mũka [bghmnr]	
PFX 612 0 mũkaa [bghmnr] 	
PFX 612 a mũka a[^cktĩ]	 	
PFX 612 a mũkaa a[^cktĩ] 	
PFX 612 e mũke e[^cktĩ]	
PFX 612 e mũge e[cktĩ]	
PFX 612 e mũgee e[cktĩ]		
PFX 612 i mũkai i[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 i mũkaai i[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 i mũgai i[cktĩ]
PFX 612 i mũgaai i[cktĩ]
PFX 612 ĩ mũke ĩ[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 ĩ mũkee ĩ[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 ĩ mũge ĩ[cktĩ]
PFX 612 ĩ mũgee ĩ[cktĩ]
PFX 612 ũ mũko ũ[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 ũ mũkoo ũ[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 ũ mũgo ũ[cktĩ]
PFX 612 ũ mũgoo ũ[cktĩ]
PFX 612 o mũko o[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 o mũkoo o[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 o mũgo o[cktĩ]
PFX 612 o mũgoo o[cktĩ]
PFX 612 a mũga a[cktĩ]
PFX 612 a mũgaa a[cktĩ]
PFX 612 0 mũga [ckt]
PFX 612 0 mũgaa [ckt]
PFX 612 0 aka [bghmnr]	
PFX 612 0 akaa [bghmnr] 	
PFX 612 a aka a[^cktĩ]	 	
PFX 612 a akaa a[^cktĩ] 	
PFX 612 e ake e[^cktĩ]	
PFX 612 e age e[cktĩ]	
PFX 612 e agee e[cktĩ]		
PFX 612 i akai i[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 i akaai i[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 i agai i[cktĩ]
PFX 612 i agaai i[cktĩ]
PFX 612 ĩ ake ĩ[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 ĩ akee ĩ[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 ĩ age ĩ[cktĩ]
PFX 612 ĩ agee ĩ[cktĩ]
PFX 612 ũ ako ũ[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 ũ akoo ũ[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 ũ ago ũ[cktĩ]
PFX 612 ũ agoo ũ[cktĩ]
PFX 612 o ako o[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 o akoo o[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 o ago o[cktĩ]
PFX 612 o agoo o[cktĩ]
PFX 612 a aga a[cktĩ]
PFX 612 a agaa a[cktĩ]
PFX 612 0 aga [ckt]
PFX 612 0 agaa [ckt]
PFX 612 0 maka [bghmnr]	
PFX 612 0 makaa [bghmnr] 	
PFX 612 a maka a[^cktĩ]	 	
PFX 612 a makaa a[^cktĩ] 	
PFX 612 e make e[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 e makee e[^cktĩ]	
PFX 612 e mage e[cktĩ]	
PFX 612 e magee e[cktĩ]		
PFX 612 i makai i[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 i makaai i[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 i magai i[cktĩ]
PFX 612 i magaai i[cktĩ]
PFX 612 ĩ make ĩ[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 ĩ makee ĩ[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 ĩ mage ĩ[cktĩ]
PFX 612 ĩ magee ĩ[cktĩ]
PFX 612 ũ mako ũ[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 ũ makoo ũ[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 ũ mago ũ[cktĩ]
PFX 612 ũ magoo ũ[cktĩ]
PFX 612 o mako o[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 o makoo o[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 o mago o[cktĩ]
PFX 612 o magoo o[cktĩ]
PFX 612 a maga a[cktĩ]
PFX 612 a magaa a[cktĩ]
PFX 612 0 maga [ckt]
PFX 612 0 magaa [ckt]
PFX 612 0 ĩka [bghmnr]	
PFX 612 0 ĩkaa [bghmnr] 	
PFX 612 a ĩka a[^cktĩ]	 	
PFX 612 a ĩkaa a[^cktĩ] 	
PFX 612 e ĩke e[^cktĩ]	
PFX 612 e ĩge e[cktĩ]	
PFX 612 e ĩgee e[cktĩ]		
PFX 612 i ĩkai i[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 i ĩkaai i[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 i ĩgai i[cktĩ]
PFX 612 i ĩgaai i[cktĩ]
PFX 612 ĩ ĩke ĩ[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 ĩ ĩkee ĩ[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 ĩ ĩge ĩ[cktĩ]
PFX 612 ĩ ĩgee ĩ[cktĩ]
PFX 612 ũ ĩko ũ[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 ũ ĩkoo ũ[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 ũ ĩgo ũ[cktĩ]
PFX 612 ũ ĩgoo ũ[cktĩ]
PFX 612 o ĩko o[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 o ĩkoo o[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 o ĩgo o[cktĩ]
PFX 612 o ĩgoo o[cktĩ]
PFX 612 a ĩga a[cktĩ]
PFX 612 a ĩgaa a[cktĩ]
PFX 612 0 ĩga [ckt]
PFX 612 0 ĩgaa [ckt]
PFX 612 0 rĩka [bghmnr]	
PFX 612 0 rĩkaa [bghmnr] 	
PFX 612 a rĩka a[^cktĩ]	 	
PFX 612 a rĩkaa a[^cktĩ] 	
PFX 612 e rĩke e[^cktĩ]	
PFX 612 e rĩge e[cktĩ]	
PFX 612 e rĩgee e[cktĩ]		
PFX 612 i rĩkai i[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 i rĩkaai i[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 i rĩgai i[cktĩ]
PFX 612 i rĩgaai i[cktĩ]
PFX 612 ĩ rĩke ĩ[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 ĩ rĩkee ĩ[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 ĩ rĩge ĩ[cktĩ]
PFX 612 ĩ rĩgee ĩ[cktĩ]
PFX 612 ũ rĩko ũ[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 ũ rĩkoo ũ[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 ũ rĩgo ũ[cktĩ]
PFX 612 ũ rĩgoo ũ[cktĩ]
PFX 612 o rĩko o[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 o rĩkoo o[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 o rĩgo o[cktĩ]
PFX 612 o rĩgoo o[cktĩ]
PFX 612 a rĩga a[cktĩ]
PFX 612 a rĩgaa a[cktĩ]
PFX 612 0 rĩga [ckt]
PFX 612 0 rĩgaa [ckt]
PFX 612 0 gĩka [bghmnr]	
PFX 612 0 gĩkaa [bghmnr] 	
PFX 612 a gĩka a[^cktĩ]	 	
PFX 612 a gĩkaa a[^cktĩ] 	
PFX 612 e gĩke e[^cktĩ]	
PFX 612 e gĩge e[cktĩ]	
PFX 612 e gĩgee e[cktĩ]		
PFX 612 i gĩkai i[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 i gĩkaai i[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 i gĩgai i[cktĩ]
PFX 612 i gĩgaai i[cktĩ]
PFX 612 ĩ gĩke ĩ[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 ĩ gĩkee ĩ[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 ĩ gĩge ĩ[cktĩ]
PFX 612 ĩ gĩgee ĩ[cktĩ]
PFX 612 ũ gĩko ũ[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 ũ gĩkoo ũ[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 ũ gĩgo ũ[cktĩ]
PFX 612 ũ gĩgoo ũ[cktĩ]
PFX 612 o gĩko o[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 o gĩkoo o[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 o gĩgo o[cktĩ]
PFX 612 o gĩgoo o[cktĩ]
PFX 612 a gĩga a[cktĩ]
PFX 612 a gĩgaa a[cktĩ]
PFX 612 0 gĩga [ckt]
PFX 612 0 gĩgaa [ckt]
PFX 612 0 ika [bghmnr]	
PFX 612 0 ikaa [bghmnr] 	
PFX 612 a ika a[^cktĩ]	 	
PFX 612 a ikaa a[^cktĩ] 	
PFX 612 e ike e[^cktĩ]	
PFX 612 e ige e[cktĩ]	
PFX 612 e igee e[cktĩ]		
PFX 612 i ikai i[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 i ikaai i[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 i igai i[cktĩ]
PFX 612 i igaai i[cktĩ]
PFX 612 ĩ ike ĩ[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 ĩ ikee ĩ[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 ĩ ige ĩ[cktĩ]
PFX 612 ĩ igee ĩ[cktĩ]
PFX 612 ũ iko ũ[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 ũ ikoo ũ[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 ũ igo ũ[cktĩ]
PFX 612 ũ igoo ũ[cktĩ]
PFX 612 o iko o[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 o ikoo o[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 o igo o[cktĩ]
PFX 612 o igoo o[cktĩ]
PFX 612 a iga a[cktĩ]
PFX 612 a igaa a[cktĩ]
PFX 612 0 iga [ckt]
PFX 612 0 igaa [ckt]
PFX 612 0 cika [bghmnr]	
PFX 612 0 cikaa [bghmnr] 	
PFX 612 a cika a[^cktĩ]	 	
PFX 612 a cikaa a[^cktĩ] 	
PFX 612 e cike e[^cktĩ]	
PFX 612 e cige e[cktĩ]	
PFX 612 e cigee e[cktĩ]		
PFX 612 i cikai i[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 i cikaai i[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 i cigai i[cktĩ]
PFX 612 i cigaai i[cktĩ]
PFX 612 ĩ cike ĩ[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 ĩ cikee ĩ[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 ĩ cige ĩ[cktĩ]
PFX 612 ĩ cigee ĩ[cktĩ]
PFX 612 ũ ciko ũ[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 ũ cikoo ũ[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 ũ cigo ũ[cktĩ]
PFX 612 ũ cigoo ũ[cktĩ]
PFX 612 o ciko o[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 o cikoo o[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 o cigo o[cktĩ]
PFX 612 o cigoo o[cktĩ]
PFX 612 a ciga a[cktĩ]
PFX 612 a cigaa a[cktĩ]
PFX 612 0 ciga [ckt]
PFX 612 0 cigaa [ckt]
PFX 612 0 rũka [bghmnr]	
PFX 612 0 rũkaa [bghmnr] 	
PFX 612 a rũka a[^cktĩ]	 	
PFX 612 a rũkaa a[^cktĩ] 	
PFX 612 e rũke e[^cktĩ]	
PFX 612 e rũge e[cktĩ]	
PFX 612 e rũgee e[cktĩ]		
PFX 612 i rũkai i[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 i rũkaai i[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 i rũgai i[cktĩ]
PFX 612 i rũgaai i[cktĩ]
PFX 612 ĩ rũke ĩ[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 ĩ rũkee ĩ[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 ĩ rũge ĩ[cktĩ]
PFX 612 ĩ rũgee ĩ[cktĩ]
PFX 612 ũ rũko ũ[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 ũ rũkoo ũ[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 ũ rũgo ũ[cktĩ]
PFX 612 ũ rũgoo ũ[cktĩ]
PFX 612 o rũko o[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 o rũkoo o[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 o rũgo o[cktĩ]
PFX 612 o rũgoo o[cktĩ]
PFX 612 a rũga a[cktĩ]
PFX 612 a rũgaa a[cktĩ]
PFX 612 0 rũga [ckt]
PFX 612 0 rũgaa [ckt]
PFX 612 0 gaka [bghmnr]	
PFX 612 0 gakaa [bghmnr] 	
PFX 612 a gaka a[^cktĩ]	 	
PFX 612 a gakaa a[^cktĩ] 	
PFX 612 e gake e[^cktĩ]	
PFX 612 e gage e[cktĩ]	
PFX 612 e gagee e[cktĩ]		
PFX 612 i gakai i[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 i gakaai i[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 i gagai i[cktĩ]
PFX 612 i gagaai i[cktĩ]
PFX 612 ĩ gake ĩ[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 ĩ gakee ĩ[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 ĩ gage ĩ[cktĩ]
PFX 612 ĩ gagee ĩ[cktĩ]
PFX 612 ũ gako ũ[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 ũ gakoo ũ[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 ũ gago ũ[cktĩ]
PFX 612 ũ gagoo ũ[cktĩ]
PFX 612 o gako o[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 o gakoo o[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 o gago o[cktĩ]
PFX 612 o gagoo o[cktĩ]
PFX 612 a gaga a[cktĩ]
PFX 612 a gagaa a[cktĩ]
PFX 612 0 gaga [ckt]
PFX 612 0 gagaa [ckt]
PFX 612 0 gũka [bghmnr]	
