Materials for lyx workshop/LyX.app/Contents/Resources/dicts/kik_KE.dic
aha/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
amba/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
ananga/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
anĩrĩra/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
arama/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
athimũra/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
bacia/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
bunja/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
caaya/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
camũra/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
carĩka/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
cenga/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
ciimba/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
cina/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
coka/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
cora/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
cuura/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
ehera/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
engea/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
erekera/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
garagara/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
geithia/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
gita/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
gunya/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
gĩgĩma/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
hagĩra/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
hangĩra/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
heeha/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
hihinya/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
hitia/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
hota/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
hurũka/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
hĩnduka/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
hũnga/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
hũũta/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
ikũrũka/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
inĩka/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
kanya/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
kima/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
koomba/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
kunda/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
kuua/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
kũra/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
menya/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
momora/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
negena/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
ng'ũrĩka/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
nyaaga/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
oha/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
raara/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
regera/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
riha/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
rora/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
rĩha/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
rũmanĩrĩra/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
tamba/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
teereta/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
teng'era/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
thaitha/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
thegetha/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
thika/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
thirima/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
thogora/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
thuka/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
thũka/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
tindĩka/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
tongoria/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
tuma/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
tuuma/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
tũmĩra/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
umĩra/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
ũka/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
ũndũra/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
